Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.050

Compliance with secretary's determination.

Applicants shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary as provided by RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 24; 1991 c 3 s 108; 1985 c 7 s 48; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 51; 1917 c 160 s 3; RRS s 10176.]

NOTES:

Limitation on increases in midwifery fees: RCW 43.24.086.